Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-507
Rule 507. Political vote; privilege.

Every person has a privilege to refuse to disclose the tenor of his vote at a political election conducted by secret ballot unless the vote was cast illegally.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 27.